Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.011

Assault in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of assault in the first degree if he or she, with intent to inflict great bodily harm:

(a) Assaults another with a firearm or any deadly weapon or by any force or means likely to produce great bodily harm or death; or

(b) Transmits HIV to a child or vulnerable adult; or

(c) Administers, exposes, or transmits to or causes to be taken by another, poison or any other destructive or noxious substance; or

(d) Assaults another and inflicts great bodily harm.

(2) Assault in the first degree is a class A felony.

[ 2020 c 76 s 16; 1997 c 196 s 1; 1986 c 257 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 257: See note following RCW 9A.56.010.

Effective date—1986 c 257 ss 3-10: See note following RCW 9A.04.110.